Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3629
Connection of lot or structure; when allowed.

No county shall permit the connection of any lot or any structure used or to be used for any residential purpose to a sewerage disposal system and plant or plants constructed pursuant to the County Industrial Sewer Construction Act unless (1) such lot was platted and recorded prior to March 1, 1994, or such structure is or will be constructed on a lot platted and recorded prior to March 1, 1994, or (2) such connection is authorized by the appropriate city or village as provided in the act.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 29.